Illinois, session 104th, HB207.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Business Corporation Act of 1983 is amended 5by changing Section 1.01 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 5/1.01)  (from Ch. 32, par. 1.01)7    Sec. 1.01. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may 8be cited as the "Business Corporation Act of 1983".9(Source: P.A. 83-1025.)